California, session 20252026, AB631.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following: (1) The official state pet is the shelter pet, demonstrating that Californians care deeply about the welfare of shelter animals.(2) Public or private animal control agencies or shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animal shelters, humane society shelters, and rescue groups perform invaluable work to protect the welfare of animals in our communities.(3) These organizations not only provide critical care and safe refuge for animals in need but also play a vital role in addressing the pet overpopulation crisis through rescue, rehabilitation, and adoption services and spay and neuter programs.(4) These organizations’ dedication helps reduce stray animal populations, prevent unnecessary euthanasia, and promote responsible pet ownership, ultimately contributing to healthier, more compassionate communities.(5) Accurate public reporting on data related to animal intake and outcomes is important to evaluate the effectiveness of existing policy, make evidence-based decisions, and move towards impactful goals to improve animal welfare statewide.(b) It is the intent of this act to require public and private animal control agencies and shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animal shelters, and humane society shelters to report specified data, and to strongly encourage rescue groups to report specified data.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 32004 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, immediately following Section 32003, to read:32004. (a) For purposes of this section, “animal both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Animal shelter” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30503.5. means a public or private animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter.(2) “Rescue group” means a for-profit or not-for-profit entity with at least one of its purposes being the sale or placement of animals that have been removed from a public or private animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter, or that have been previously owned by a person other than the original breeder of that animal.(b) An animal shelter shall collect and record all of the following information:(1) The number of animals taken in with separate categories for dogs, cats, and other animals.(2)  The source of intake separated by category, including, but not limited to, stray animals, surrendered by owner, or transferred from another animal shelter.(3) The outcomes for all animals separated by category, including, but not limited to, returned to owner, adopted, transferred to another organization, euthanized, died in care, or dead upon arrival.(c) The information required to be collected and recorded pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be updated at least once per quarter and shall be handled as follows:(1) If an animal shelter has an internet website, the animal shelter shall post the information on its internet website and the information shall remain publicly accessible on the internet website for at least five years.(2) If an animal shelter does not have an internet website, the animal shelter shall make the information publicly available, upon request, for at least five years.(d) For the purpose of developing a holistic picture of the pet overpopulation crisis, rescue groups are encouraged to comply with subdivisions (b) and (c).(d)(e) Animal shelters and rescue groups with local contracts for animal care are encouraged to make the information available in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software application that is widely used at the time of the posting.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.